Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.428

Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program—Repeal.

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2026:

RCW 28B.76.730 and 2019 c 176 s 1.

[ 2019 c 176 s 4.]